src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-mingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, plural object
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: [миманум, мимананум]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [миман, мима̄нын]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: [мима̄нэ, мимана̄нэ]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [миманаме̄н, мимананме̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [миманн, миманы̄н, мимананы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [миманэ̄н, мимананэ̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [миманув, миманӯв, мимананув, мимананӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [миманы̄н, мимананы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [мима̄ныл, мимана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    миӈкве+V+Ger: ма̄им
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: ма̄имам
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: ма̄иман
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: [ма̄има, ма̄иматэ]
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: ма̄имаме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: ма̄иман
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: ма̄имаг
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: ма̄имав
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: ма̄иман
    миӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: ма̄имат

#Privative
    миӈкве+V+VAbess: мыгтал
